Montana, session 2025, HB729.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 33-26-106, MCA, is amended to read:
"33-26-106. Cost of surety bond to be allowed in account of officer -- payment of premium and
notice. (1) Any court or officer whose duty it is to pass upon on the account of any person or corporation
required by law to give a bond may, whenever such the person or corporation has given any such a surety
company as surety upon such on the bond, allow in the settlement of such the account a reasonable sum for
the expense of procuring such the surety.
(2) (a) A surety bail bond insurance producer who provides surety appearance bonds shall collect
a minimum premium of 10% of the guaranteed amount of the surety appearance bond.
(b) A surety bail bond producer may not require additional fees to be collected after the payment of
the minimum premium unless the bail bond producer specifically discloses the additional fees and a fee
schedule in the contract.
(c) The premium must be collected in full, and a receipt must be provided with the surety
appearance bond and power in accordance with 46-9-401."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 729
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 729, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 729
INTRODUCED BY N. NICOL
AN ACT REVISING SURETY BAIL BOND INSURANCE LAWS TO REQUIRE THE PRODUCER TO COLLECT
A MINIMUM OF 10% OF THE GUARANTEED AMOUNT OF THE SURETY APPEARANCE BOND; PROVIDING
FOR THE COLLECTION OF A MINIMUM PREMIUM IN FULL AND FOR A RECEIPT TO BE PROVIDED; AND
AMENDING SECTION 33-26-106, MCA.”